West Virginia, session 2026, HB4319.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies  to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Real Estate Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 31, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-40-8 of this code, modified by the Real Estate Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 18, 2025, relating to the Real Estate Commission (licensing real estate brokers, associate brokers, and salespersons, and the conduct of brokerage business, 174 CSR 01), is authorized.